Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6209
Grandfather clause, defined.

Grandfather clause shall mean a provision in a regulatory statute applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational tasks.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 9.